Nevada, session 83, AB134.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 533 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person who holds a perfected water right, may submit a
water conservation plan to the State Engineer for approval. The
plan must be on a form prescribed by the State Engineer and must
include:
(a) The name and mailing address of the person;
(b) A description of each perfected water right that will be
subject to the plan, including, without limitation, the certificate
number of the perfected water right;
(c) The point of diversion and beneficial use of each perfected
water right that is subject to the plan;
(d) A description of the practices of water conservation that
have been or will be used to conserve water;
(e) The term for which the plan will be implemented, which
may not exceed 10 years;
(f) A statement that the person voluntarily submitted the plan;
(g) A statement that the intent of the plan is to temporarily
reduce the use or diversion of water;
(h) A statement that the practices of water conservation
described in the plan will contribute to the practical and
economical management, conservation and use of water in this
State; and
-
*AB134*

– 3 –
(i) A statement that the person who holds the perfected water
right that is subject to the plan does not intend to abandon or
forfeit the perfected water right during the term of the plan.
2. The owner of a perfected water right that is subject to a
water conservation plan may submit a subsequent water
conservation plan before the expiration of the current plan for
additional terms which may not exceed 10 years each.
3. The State Engineer may not charge a fee for the
submission of a water conservation plan pursuant to this section.
4. As a condition of approval, the State Engineer may require
a person who submits a water conservation plan pursuant to this
section to submit periodic statements of the amount of water that
is conserved under the water conservation plan once implemented.
5. If approved by the State Engineer, a person holding a
perfected water right that is subject to a water conservation plan
may not change the place of diversion, manner of use or place of
use of the perfected water right during the term of the water
conservation plan.
6. A perfected water right that is subject to a water
conservation plan:
(a) For which the holder of the perfected water right submits a
claim of a vested right pursuant to NRS 533.087 to 533.320,
inclusive, must be adjudicated in the same manner as all other
claims of vested rights;
(b) Constitutes water committed for use for the purposes of
NRS 533.0241; and
(c) Is not subject to abandonment or forfeiture pursuant to
NRS 533.060 or 534.090.
7. As used in this section, “perfected water right” means a
water right that has been finalized through the issuance of:
(a) A certificate of appropriation; or
(b) A court decree.
Sec. 2. NRS 533.024 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.024 The Legislature declares that:
1. It is the policy of this State:
(a) To encourage and promote the use of effluent, where that use
is not contrary to the public health, safety or welfare, and where that
use does not interfere with federal obligations to deliver water of the
Colorado River.
(b) To recognize the importance of domestic wells as
appurtenances to private homes, to create a protectable interest in
such wells and to protect their supply of water from unreasonable
adverse effects which are caused by municipal, quasi-municipal or
industrial uses and which cannot reasonably be mitigated.
-
*AB134*

– 4 –
(c) To encourage the State Engineer to consider the best
available science in rendering decisions concerning the available
surface and underground sources of water in Nevada.
(d) To encourage and promote the use of water to prevent or
reduce the spread of wildfire or to rehabilitate areas burned by
wildfire, including, without limitation, through the establishment of
vegetative cover that is resistant to fire.
(e) To manage conjunctively the appropriation, use and
administration of all waters of this State, regardless of the source of
the water.
(f) To promote and encourage the conservation, development,
augmentation and efficient use of the waters of this State through
the use of practices for the voluntary conservation of water,
including, without limitation, water conservation plans, crop
rotation or conversion, improved irrigation practices and
reductions in surface and seepage losses of water at the place of
use of water.
2. The procedures in this chapter for changing the place of
diversion, manner of use or place of use of water, and for
confirming a report of conveyance, are not intended to have the
effect of quieting title to or changing ownership of a water right and
that only a court of competent jurisdiction has the power to
determine conflicting claims to ownership of a water right.
Sec. 3. NRS 533.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.060 1. Rights to the use of water must be limited and
restricted to as much as may be necessary, when reasonably and
economically used for irrigation and other beneficial purposes,
irrespective of the carrying capacity of the ditch. The balance of the
water not so appropriated must be allowed to flow in the natural
stream from which the ditch draws its supply of water, and must not
be considered as having been appropriated thereby.
2. Rights to the use of surface water shall not be deemed to be
lost or otherwise forfeited for the failure to use the water therefrom
for a beneficial purpose.
3. A surface water right that is appurtenant to land formerly
used primarily for agricultural purposes is not subject to a
determination of abandonment if the surface water right:
(a) Is appurtenant to land that has been converted to urban use;
or
(b) Has been dedicated to or acquired by a water purveyor,
public utility or public body for municipal use.
4. A surface water right that is subject to a water
conservation plan submitted pursuant to section 1 of this act is not
subject to a determination of abandonment.
-
*AB134*

– 5 –
5. In a determination of whether a right to use surface water
has been abandoned, a presumption that the right to use the surface
water has not been abandoned is created upon the submission of
records, photographs, receipts, contracts, affidavits or any other
proof of the occurrence of any of the following events or actions
within a 10-year period immediately preceding any claim that the
right to use the water has been abandoned:
(a) The delivery of water;
(b) The payment of any costs of maintenance and other
operational costs incurred in delivering the water;
(c) The payment of any costs for capital improvements,
including works of diversion and irrigation; or
(d) The actual performance of maintenance related to the
delivery of the water.
[5.] 6. A prescriptive right to the use of the water or any of the
public water appropriated or unappropriated may not be acquired by
adverse possession. Any such right to appropriate any of the water
must be initiated by applying to the State Engineer for a permit to
appropriate the water as provided in this chapter.
[6.] 7. The State of Nevada reserves for its own present and
future use all rights to the use and diversion of water acquired
pursuant to chapter 462, Statutes of Nevada 1963, or otherwise
existing within the watersheds of Marlette Lake, Franktown Creek
and Hobart Creek and not lawfully appropriated on April 26, 1963,
by any person other than the Marlette Lake Company. Such a right
must not be appropriated by any person without the express consent
of the Legislature.
Sec. 4. NRS 533.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.370 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 533.0241, 533.345, 533.371, 533.372 and 533.503, the State
Engineer shall approve an application submitted in proper form
which contemplates the application of water to beneficial use if:
(a) The application is accompanied by the prescribed fees;
(b) The proposed use or change, if within an irrigation district,
does not adversely affect the cost of water for other holders of water
rights in the district or lessen the efficiency of the district in its
delivery or use of water; and
(c) The applicant provides proof satisfactory to the State
Engineer of the applicant’s:
(1) Intention in good faith to construct any work necessary to
apply the water to the intended beneficial use with reasonable
diligence; and
(2) Financial ability and reasonable expectation actually to
construct the work and apply the water to the intended beneficial use
with reasonable diligence.
-
*AB134*

– 6 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, where there
is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of supply, where
the groundwater that has not been committed for use has been
reserved pursuant to NRS 533.0241 or where its proposed use or
change conflicts with existing rights , including, without limitation,
existing rights that are subject to a water conservation plan
submitted pursuant to section 1 of this act, or with protectable
interests in existing domestic wells as set forth in NRS 533.024, or
threatens to prove detrimental to the public interest, the State
Engineer shall reject the application and refuse to issue the
requested permit. If a previous application for a similar use of water
within the same basin has been rejected on those grounds, the new
application may be denied without publication.
3. In addition to the criteria set forth in subsections 1 and 2, in
determining whether an application for an interbasin transfer of
groundwater must be rejected pursuant to this section, the State
Engineer shall consider:
(a) Whether the applicant has justified the need to import the
water from another basin;
(b) If the State Engineer determines that a plan for conservation
of water is advisable for the basin into which the water is to be
imported, whether the applicant has demonstrated that such a plan
has been adopted and is being effectively carried out;
(c) Whether the proposed action is environmentally sound as it
relates to the basin from which the water is exported;
(d) Whether the proposed action is an appropriate long-term use
which will not unduly limit the future growth and development in
the basin from which the water is exported; and
(e) Any other factor the State Engineer determines to be
relevant.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 6 and 10 and NRS 533.365, the State Engineer shall
approve or reject each application within 2 years after the final date
for filing a protest. The State Engineer may postpone action:
(a) Upon written authorization to do so by the applicant.
(b) If an application is protested.
(c) If the purpose for which the application was made is
municipal use.
(d) In areas where studies of water supplies have been
determined to be necessary by the State Engineer pursuant to
NRS 533.368.
(e) Where court actions or adjudications are pending, which may
affect the outcome of the application.
(f) In areas in which adjudication of vested water rights is
deemed necessary by the State Engineer.
-
*AB134*

– 7 –
(g) On an application for a permit to change a vested water right
in a basin where vested water rights have not been adjudicated.
(h) Where authorized entry to any land needed to use the water
for which the application is submitted is required from a
governmental agency.
(i) On an application for which the State Engineer has required
additional information pursuant to NRS 533.375.
5. If the State Engineer does not act upon an application in
accordance with subsections 4 and 6, the application remains active
until approved or rejected by the State Engineer.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsection 10, the State Engineer shall approve or reject, within 6
months after the final date for filing a protest, an application filed to
change the point of diversion of water already appropriated when
the existing and proposed points of diversion are on the same
property for which the water has already been appropriated under
the existing water right or the proposed point of diversion is on real
property that is proven to be owned by the applicant and is
contiguous to the place of use of the existing water right. The State
Engineer may postpone action on the application pursuant to
subsection 4.
7. If the State Engineer has not approved, rejected or held a
hearing on an application within 7 years after the final date for filing
a protest, the State Engineer shall cause notice of the application to
be republished and reposted pursuant to NRS 533.360 immediately
preceding the time at which the State Engineer is ready to approve
or reject the application. The cost of the republication must be paid
by the applicant. After such republication and reposting, a protest
may be filed in accordance with NRS 533.365.
8. If a hearing is held regarding an application, the decision of
the State Engineer must be in writing and include findings of fact,
conclusions of law and a statement of the underlying facts
supporting the findings of fact. The written decision may take the
form of a transcription of an oral ruling. The rejection or approval of
an application must be endorsed on a copy of the original
application, and a record must be made of the endorsement in the
records of the State Engineer. The copy of the application so
endorsed must be returned to the applicant. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 11, if the application is approved, the
applicant may, on receipt thereof, proceed with the construction of
the necessary works and take all steps required to apply the water to
beneficial use and to perfect the proposed appropriation. If the
application is rejected, the applicant may take no steps toward
the prosecution of the proposed work or the diversion and use of the
public water while the rejection continues in force.
-
*AB134*

– 8 –
9. If a person is the successor in interest of an owner of a water
right or an owner of real property upon which a domestic well is
located and if the former owner of the water right or real property on
which a domestic well is located had previously filed a written
protest against the granting of an application, the successor in
interest must be allowed to pursue that protest in the same manner
as if the successor in interest were the former owner whose interest
he or she succeeded. If the successor in interest wishes to pursue the
protest, the successor in interest must notify the State Engineer in a
timely manner on a form provided by the State Engineer.
10. The provisions of subsections 1 to 9, inclusive, do not
apply to an application for an environmental permit or a temporary
permit issued pursuant to NRS 533.436 or 533.504.
11. The provisions of subsection 8 do not authorize the
recipient of an approved application to use any state land
administered by the Division of State Lands of the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources without the appropriate
authorization for that use from the State Land Registrar.
12. As used in this section, “domestic well” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 534.350.
Sec. 5. NRS 533.371 is hereby amended to read as follows:
533.371 The State Engineer shall reject the application and
refuse to issue a permit to appropriate water for a specified period if
the State Engineer determines that:
1. The application is incomplete;
2. The prescribed fees have not been paid;
3. The proposed use is not temporary;
4. There is no water available from the proposed source of
supply without exceeding the perennial yield or safe yield of that
source;
5. The groundwater that has not been committed for use from
the proposed source of supply has been reserved pursuant to
NRS 533.0241;
6. The proposed use conflicts with existing rights [;] ,
including, without limitation, existing rights that are subject to a
water conservation plan submitted pursuant to section 1 of this
act; or
7. The proposed use threatens to prove detrimental to the
public interest.
Sec. 6. NRS 534.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section [,]
and section 1 of this act, failure for 5 successive years after
April 15, 1967, on the part of the holder of any right, whether it is
an adjudicated right, an unadjudicated right or a right for which a
certificate has been issued pursuant to NRS 533.425, and further
-
*AB134*

– 9 –
whether the right is initiated after or before March 25, 1939, to use
beneficially all or any part of the underground water for the purpose
for which the right is acquired or claimed, works a forfeiture of both
undetermined rights and determined rights to the use of that water to
the extent of the nonuse.
2. If the records of the State Engineer or any other documents
obtained by or provided to the State Engineer indicate 4 or more
consecutive years of nonuse of all or any part of a water right which
is governed by this chapter:
(a) The State Engineer shall notify the owner of the water right,
as determined in the records of the Office of the State Engineer, by
registered or certified mail of the nonuse and that the owner has 1
year after the date of the notice of nonuse in which to use the water
right beneficially and to provide proof of such use to the State
Engineer or apply for relief pursuant to subsection 3 to avoid
forfeiting the water right.
(b) If, after 1 year after the date of the notice of nonuse pursuant
to paragraph (a), proof of resumption of beneficial use is not filed in
the Office of the State Engineer, the State Engineer shall, unless the
State Engineer has granted a request to extend the time necessary to
work a forfeiture of the water right, send a final notice to the owner
of the water right, as determined in the records of the Office of the
State Engineer, by registered or certified mail, that the water right is
held for forfeiture. If the owner of the water right, within 30 days
after the date of such final notice, fails to file the required proof of
resumption of beneficial use or an application for an extension of
time to prevent forfeiture, the State Engineer shall declare the right,
or the portion of the right not returned to beneficial use, forfeited.
The State Engineer shall send notice of the declaration of forfeiture,
by registered or certified mail, to the owner of record, as determined
in the records of the Office of the State Engineer, of the water right
that has been declared forfeited.
(c) If, after receipt of a notice of the declaration of forfeiture
pursuant to paragraph (b), the owner of record of the water right
fails to appeal the ruling in the manner provided for in NRS
533.450, and within the time provided for therein, the forfeiture
becomes final. Upon the forfeiture of the water right, the water
reverts to the public and is available for further appropriation,
subject to existing rights.
3. The State Engineer may, upon the request of the holder of
any right described in subsection 1, extend the time necessary to
work a forfeiture under subsection 2 if the request is made before
the expiration of the time necessary to work a forfeiture. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 4, the State Engineer may grant,
upon request and for good cause shown, any number of extensions,
-
*AB134*

– 10 –
but a single extension must not exceed 1 year. In determining
whether to grant or deny a request, the State Engineer shall, among
other reasons, consider:
(a) Whether the holder has submitted proof and evidence that
the holder is proceeding in good faith and with reasonable diligence
to resume use of the water beneficially for the purpose for which the
holder’s right is acquired or claimed;
(b) The number of years during which the water has not been
put to the beneficial use for which the right is acquired or claimed;
(c) Any economic conditions or natural disasters which made
the holder unable to put the water to that use;
(d) Whether the water right is located in a basin within a county
under a declaration of drought by the Governor, United States
Secretary of Agriculture or the President of the United States;
(e) Whether the holder has demonstrated efforts to conserve
water which have resulted in a reduction in water consumption;
(f) Whether the water right is located in a basin that has been
designated as a critical management area by the State Engineer
pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 534.110;
(g) The date of priority of the water right as it relates to the
potential curtailment of water use in the basin;
(h) The availability of water in the basin, including, without
limitation, whether withdrawals of water consistently exceed the
perennial yield of the basin; and
(i) Any orders restricting use or appropriation of water in the
basin.
 The State Engineer shall notify, by registered or certified mail,
the owner of the water right, as determined in the records of the
Office of the State Engineer, of whether the State Engineer has
granted or denied the holder’s request for an extension pursuant to
this subsection. If the State Engineer grants an extension pursuant to
this subsection and, before the expiration of that extension, proof of
resumption of beneficial use or another request for an extension is
not filed in the Office of the State Engineer, the State Engineer shall
send a final notice to the owner of the water right, by registered or
certified mail, that the water right will be declared forfeited if the
owner of the water right fails to file the required proof of
resumption of beneficial use or an application for an extension of
time to prevent forfeiture within 30 days after the date of the final
notice. If the owner of the water right fails to file the required proof
of resumption of beneficial use or an application for an extension of
time to prevent forfeiture within 30 days after the date of such final
notice, the State Engineer shall declare the water right, or the
portion of the right not returned to beneficial use, forfeited.
-
*AB134*

– 11 –
4. If the State Engineer grants an extension pursuant to
subsection 1 in a basin:
(a) Where withdrawals of groundwater consistently exceed the
perennial yield of the basin; or
(b) That has been designated as a critical management area by
the State Engineer pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 534.110,
 a single extension must not exceed 3 years, but any number of
extensions may be granted to the holder of such a right.
5. The failure to receive a notice pursuant to subsection 2 or 3
does not nullify the forfeiture or extend the time necessary to work
the forfeiture of a water right.
6. A right to use underground water whether it is vested or
otherwise may be lost by abandonment. If the State Engineer, in
investigating a groundwater source, upon which there has been a
prior right, for the purpose of acting upon an application to
appropriate water from the same source, is of the belief from his or
her examination that an abandonment has taken place, the State
Engineer shall so state in the ruling approving the application. If,
upon notice by registered or certified mail to the owner of record
who had the prior right, the owner of record of the prior right fails to
appeal the ruling in the manner provided for in NRS 533.450, and
within the time provided for therein, the alleged abandonment
declaration as set forth by the State Engineer becomes final.
Sec. 7. NRS 534.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534.110 1. The State Engineer shall administer this chapter
and shall prescribe all necessary regulations within the terms of this
chapter for its administration.
2. The State Engineer may:
(a) Require periodical statements of water elevations, water
used, and acreage on which water was used from all holders of
permits and claimants of vested rights.
(b) Upon his or her own initiation, conduct pumping tests to
determine if overpumping is indicated, to determine the specific
yield of the aquifers and to determine permeability characteristics.
3. The State Engineer shall determine whether there is
unappropriated water in the area affected and may issue permits
only if the determination is affirmative. The State Engineer may
require each applicant to whom a permit is issued for a well:
(a) For municipal, quasi-municipal or industrial use; and
(b) Whose reasonably expected rate of diversion is one-half
cubic foot per second or more,
 to report periodically to the State Engineer concerning the effect
of that well on other previously existing wells that are located within
2,500 feet of the well.
-
*AB134*

– 12 –
4. It is a condition of each appropriation of groundwater
acquired under this chapter that the right of the appropriator relates
to a specific quantity of water and that the right must allow for a
reasonable lowering of the static water level at the appropriator’s
point of diversion. In determining a reasonable lowering of the static
water level in a particular area, the State Engineer shall consider the
economics of pumping water for the general type of crops growing
and may also consider the effect of using water on the economy of
the area in general.
5. This section does not prevent the granting of permits to
applicants later in time on the ground that the diversions under the
proposed later appropriations may cause the water level to be
lowered at the point of diversion of a prior appropriator, so long as
any protectable interests in existing domestic wells as set forth in
NRS 533.024 and the rights of holders of existing appropriations ,
including, without limitation, any existing rights that are subject
to a water conservation plan submitted pursuant to section 1 of
this act, can be satisfied under such express conditions. At the time
a permit is granted for a well:
(a) For municipal, quasi-municipal or industrial use; and
(b) Whose reasonably expected rate of diversion is one-half
cubic foot per second or more,
 the State Engineer shall include as a condition of the permit that
pumping water pursuant to the permit may be limited or prohibited
to prevent any unreasonable adverse effects on an existing domestic
well located within 2,500 feet of the well, unless the holder of the
permit and the owner of the domestic well have agreed to alternative
measures that mitigate those adverse effects.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the State
Engineer shall conduct investigations in any basin or portion thereof
where it appears that the average annual replenishment to the
groundwater supply may not be adequate for the needs of all
permittees and all vested-right claimants, and if the findings of the
State Engineer so indicate, except as otherwise provided in
subsection 9, the State Engineer may order that withdrawals,
including, without limitation, withdrawals from domestic wells, be
restricted to conform to priority rights until the water level of the
basin is stabilized.
7. The State Engineer:
(a) May designate as a critical management area any basin in
which withdrawals of groundwater consistently exceed the perennial
yield of the basin.
(b) Shall designate as a critical management area any basin in
which withdrawals of groundwater consistently exceed the perennial
yield of the basin upon receipt of a petition for such a designation
-
*AB134*

– 13 –
which is signed by the holders of certificates or permits to
appropriate water in the basin that are on file in the Office of the
State Engineer who represent a majority of groundwater permitted
or certificated for use in the basin.
 The designation of a basin as a critical management area pursuant
to this subsection may be appealed pursuant to NRS 533.450. If a
basin has been designated as a critical management area for 10
consecutive years, except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, the
State Engineer shall order that withdrawals, including, without
limitation, withdrawals from domestic wells, be restricted in that
basin to conform to priority rights until the water level of the basin
is stabilized, unless a groundwater management plan has been
approved for the basin pursuant to NRS 534.037.
8. In any basin or portion thereof in the State designated by the
State Engineer, the State Engineer may restrict drilling of wells in
any portion thereof if the State Engineer determines that additional
wells would cause an undue interference with existing wells. Any
order or decision of the State Engineer so restricting drilling of such
wells may be reviewed by the district court of the county pursuant to
NRS 533.450.
9. If a court of competent jurisdiction orders the State Engineer
to restrict withdrawals to conform to priority rights or if pursuant to
subsection 6 or 7 or subsection 8 of NRS 534.037 the State Engineer
orders that withdrawals be restricted to conform to priority rights,
the State Engineer must limit the restriction of withdrawals from a
domestic well to allow a domestic well to continue to withdraw 0.5
acre-feet of water per year, which must be recorded by a water
meter.
Sec. 8. NRS 534.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534.120 1. Within an area that has been designated by the
State Engineer, as provided for in this chapter, where, in the
judgment of the State Engineer, the groundwater basin is being
depleted, the State Engineer in his or her administrative capacity
may make such rules, regulations and orders as are deemed essential
for the welfare of the area involved.
2. In the interest of public welfare, the State Engineer is
authorized and directed to designate preferred uses of water within
the respective areas so designated by the State Engineer and from
which the groundwater is being depleted, and in acting on
applications to appropriate groundwater, the State Engineer may
designate such preferred uses in different categories with respect to
the particular areas involved within the following limits:
(a) Domestic, municipal, quasi-municipal, industrial, irrigation,
mining and stock-watering uses; and
-
*AB134*

– 14 –
(b) Any uses for which a county, city, town, public water district
or public water company furnishes the water.
3. The State Engineer may only issue temporary permits to
appropriate groundwater if water cannot be furnished by a public
entity such as a water district or municipality presently engaged in
furnishing water to the inhabitants thereof. Such temporary permits
can be limited as to time and may be revoked if and when:
(a) Water can be furnished by a public entity such as a water
district or a municipality presently engaged in furnishing water to
the inhabitants thereof; and
(b) The property served is within 1,250 feet of the water
furnished pursuant to paragraph (a).
 The holder of a temporary permit that is revoked pursuant to this
subsection must be given 730 days from the date of revocation to
connect to the public entity furnishing water.
4. In a basin designated pursuant to NRS 534.030, the State
Engineer may:
(a) Deny applications to appropriate groundwater for any use in
areas served by a public entity such as a water district or a
municipality presently engaged in furnishing water to the
inhabitants of the area.
(b) Limit the depth of domestic wells.
(c) Prohibit the drilling of wells for domestic use in areas where
water can be furnished by a public entity such as a water district or a
municipality presently engaged in furnishing water to the
inhabitants thereof.
(d) In connection with the approval of a parcel map in which
any parcel is proposed to be served by a domestic well, require the
dedication to a city or county or a designee of a city or county, or
require a relinquishment to the State Engineer, of any right to
appropriate water required by the State Engineer to ensure a
sufficient supply of water for each of those parcels, unless the
dedication of the right to appropriate water is required by a local
ordinance.
(e) Approve a water conservation plan submitted pursuant to
section 1 of this act.
5. In an area in which have been issued temporary permits
pursuant to subsection 3, the State Engineer:
(a) Shall:
(1) Deny any applications to appropriate groundwater for use
in areas served by a public entity such as a water district or a
municipality presently engaged in furnishing water;
(2) Limit the depth of a domestic well; or
(3) Prohibit the drilling of wells for domestic use in areas
where water can be furnished by a public entity such as a water
-
*AB134*

– 15 –
district or a municipality presently engaged in furnishing water to
the inhabitants; and
(b) May prohibit repairs from being made to a domestic well,
and may require the person proposing to deepen or repair the
domestic well to obtain water from a public entity such as a water
district or a municipality engaged in furnishing water to the
inhabitants of the designated area, only if:
(1) The distance from the property line of any parcel served
by the well to the pipes and other appurtenances of the proposed
source of water to which the property will be connected is not more
than 180 feet; and
(2) The deepening or repair of the well would require the use
of a well-drilling rig.
6. For good and sufficient reasons, the State Engineer may
exempt the provisions of this section with respect to public housing
authorities.
7. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the State
Engineer from revoking a temporary permit issued pursuant to this
section if any parcel served by a well pursuant to the temporary
permit is currently obtaining water from a public entity such as a
water district or a municipality engaged in furnishing water to the
inhabitants of the area.
H
-
*AB134*